Illinois, session 104th, SB1693.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Community College Act is amended by 5changing Sections 7-1, 7-2, and 7-3 and by adding Sections 67-2.1, 7-2.2, and 7-2.3 as follows: 7    (110 ILCS 805/7-1)  (from Ch. 122, par. 107-1)8    Sec. 7-1. This Article applies only to community college 9districts in cities having a population of 500,000 or more 10inhabitants. Each such community college district shall 11maintain a system of community colleges under the charge of a 12board, which is appointed as provided in Section 7-2. Except 13as otherwise provided in this Article, such a community 14college district and its board have all the rights, duties, 15powers and responsibilities and are subject to the same 16limitations as are provided for other community college 17districts in this Act, as now or hereafter amended.18(Source: P.A. 78-669.) 19    (110 ILCS 805/7-2)  (from Ch. 122, par. 107-2)20    Sec. 7-2. (a) This subsection (a) applies until May 6, 212027. The board shall consist of 7 members, appointed by the 22mayor with the approval of the city council. Prior to the   SB1693- 2 -LRB104 11438 LNS 21526 b1expiration of the term of any member his successor shall be 2appointed in like manner and shall hold office for a term of 3 3years from July 1 of the year in which he is appointed and 4until his successor is appointed and qualified. Any vacancy in 5the membership of the board shall be filled through 6appointment by the mayor, with the approval of the city 7council, for the unexpired term. If any appointee fails to 8qualify within 30 days after his appointment, the office shall 9be filled by a new appointment for the unexpired term. To be 10eligible for appointment to a board under this Section, a 11person must possess the same qualifications and meet the same 12requirements as are prescribed by this Act for members of an 13elected board of a community college district.14    (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 3-7 of this 15Act, the terms of all members of the board appointed under 16subsection (a) are abolished when the new board, consisting of 1721 members, is elected by the electors of the community 18college district as provided in this subsection (b) and takes 19office.20    Beginning with the 2027 consolidated election, each member 21shall be elected for a term of 4 years and until the member's 22successor is elected and has qualified. After the 2027 23consolidated election, each member shall be elected for a term 24of 4 years, commencing on the second Tuesday in May of the year 25in which the member is elected, and until the member's 26successor is elected and has qualified. For purposes of   SB1693- 3 -LRB104 11438 LNS 21526 b1elections conducted pursuant to this subsection (b), the City 2of Chicago shall be subdivided into 20 trustee districts by 3the General Assembly for seats on the board, as provided under 4Section 7-2.3 of this Act. Each district shall be represented 5by a member, and one member shall be elected at large and serve 6as the president of the board. To be eligible for election or 7appointment to a board under this Section, a person must 8possess the same qualifications and meet the same requirements 9as are prescribed by this Act for members of an elected board 10of a community college district. A person is ineligible for 11election or appointment to a board under this Section if that 12person is an employee of a community college district within 13the city.14    (c) No member shall have or be an employee or owner of a 15company that has a contract with a community college within 16the city. No former officer, member, or employee of the board 17shall, within a period of one year immediately after 18termination of service on the board, knowingly accept 19employment or receive compensation or fees for services from a 20person or entity if the officer, member, or employee, during 21the year immediately preceding termination of service on the 22board, participated personally and substantially in the award 23of contracts with the board, community college district, or 24community colleges within the city, or the issuance of 25contract change orders with the board or the community college 26district, or community college within the city, with a   SB1693- 4 -LRB104 11438 LNS 21526 b1cumulative value of $25,000 or more to the person, the entity, 2or the entity's parent or subsidiary.3    (d) Whenever a vacancy occurs, the remaining members shall 4fill the vacancy, and the person so appointed shall serve 5until a successor is elected at the next regular election for 6board members and is certified in accordance with Sections 722-17 and 22-18 of the Election Code. If the remaining members 8fail to fill the vacancy within 60 days after the vacancy 9occurs, the chairman of the State Board shall fill that 10vacancy, and the person so appointed shall serve until a 11successor is elected at the next regular election for board 12members and is certified in accordance with Sections 22-17 and 1322-18 of the Election Code. The person appointed to fill a 14vacancy shall have the same residential qualifications as his 15or her predecessor in office was required to have. However, in 16either instance, if the vacancy occurs with more than 28 17months remaining until the term expires, the appointed member 18shall serve only until a successor is elected and qualified at 19the next scheduled election.20(Source: P.A. 78-669.) 21    (110 ILCS 805/7-2.1 new)22    Sec. 7-2.1. Nomination petitions. Notwithstanding Section 233-7.10 of this Act, in addition to the requirements of the 24general election law, the form of petitions under this Section 25shall be substantially as follows:  SB1693- 5 -LRB104 11438 LNS 21526 b1NOMINATING PETITIONS 2(LEAVE OUT THE INAPPLICABLE PART.) 3    To the Board of Election Commissioners for the City of 4Chicago: 5    We the undersigned, being (.... or more) of the voters 6residing within said district, hereby petition that .... who 7resides at .... in the City of Chicago shall be a candidate for 8the office of .... of the Board of Trustees of the City 9Colleges of Chicago, Illinois Community College District No. 10508, (full term) (vacancy) to be voted for at the election to 11be held on (insert date). 12    Name: .................. Address: ................... 13    In the designation of the name of a candidate on a petition 14for nomination, the candidate's given name or names, initial 15or initials, a nickname by which the candidate is commonly 16known, or a combination thereof may be used in addition to the 17candidate's surname. If a candidate has changed his or her 18name, whether by a statutory or common law procedure in 19Illinois or any other jurisdiction, within 3 years before the 20last day for filing the petition, then (i) the candidate's 21name on the petition must be followed by "formerly known as 22(list all prior names during the 3-year period) until name 23changed on (list date of each such name change)" and (ii) the 24petition must be accompanied by the candidate's affidavit 25stating the candidate's previous names during the period 26specified in clause (i) and the date or dates each of those   SB1693- 6 -LRB104 11438 LNS 21526 b1names was changed; failure to meet these requirements shall be 2grounds for denying certification of the candidate's name for 3the ballot, but these requirements do not apply to name 4changes resulting from adoption to assume an adoptive parent's 5or parents' surname, marriage to assume a spouse's surname, or 6dissolution of marriage or declaration of invalidity of 7marriage to assume a former surname. No other designation, 8such as a political slogan, as defined by Section 7-17 of the 9Election Code, title or degree, or nickname suggesting or 10implying possession of a title, degree or professional status, 11or similar information may be used in connection with the 12candidate's surname.13    All petitions for the nomination of members of the board 14shall be filed with the board of election commissioners of the 15jurisdiction in which the principal office of the community 16college district is located within the time provided for by 17the general election law. The board of election commissioners 18shall receive and file only those petitions that include a 19statement of candidacy, the required number of voter 20signatures, the notarized signature of the petition 21circulator, and a receipt from the County Clerk showing that 22the candidate has filed a statement of economic interest on or 23before the last day to file as required by the Illinois 24Governmental Ethics Act. The board of election commissioners 25may have petition forms available for issuance to potential 26candidates and may give notice of the petition filing period   SB1693- 7 -LRB104 11438 LNS 21526 b1by publication in a newspaper of general circulation within 2the community college district not less than 10 days prior to 3the first day of filing. The board of election commissioners 4shall make certification to the proper election authorities in 5accordance with the general election law.6    The board of election commissioners of the jurisdiction in 7which the principal office of the community college district 8is located shall notify the candidates for whom a petition for 9nomination is filed or the appropriate committee of the 10obligations under the Campaign Financing Act as provided in 11the general election law. Such notice shall be given on a form 12prescribed by the State Board of Elections and in accordance 13with the requirements of the general election law. The board 14of election commissioners shall within 7 days of filing or on 15the last day for filing, whichever is earlier, acknowledge to 16the petitioner in writing the office's acceptance of the 17petition.18    A candidate for membership on the board who has petitioned 19for nomination to fill a full term and to fill a vacant term to 20be voted upon at the same election must withdraw his or her 21petition for nomination from either the full term or the 22vacant term by written declaration. 23    Nomination petitions are not valid unless the candidate 24named therein files with the board of election commissioners a 25receipt from the county clerk showing that the candidate has 26filed a statement of economic interests as required by the   SB1693- 8 -LRB104 11438 LNS 21526 b1Illinois Governmental Ethics Act. Such receipt shall be so 2filed either previously during the calendar year in which his 3or her nomination papers were filed or within the period for 4the filing of nomination papers in accordance with the general 5election law. 6    (110 ILCS 805/7-2.2 new)7    Sec. 7-2.2. Ballots. The board of election commissioners 8of the jurisdiction in which the principal office of the 9community college district is located shall conduct a lottery 10to determine the ballot order of candidates for full terms in 11the event of any simultaneous petition filings. Such candidate 12lottery shall be conducted as follows:13    All petitions filed by persons waiting in line as of 8:00 14a.m. on the first day for filing, or as of the normal opening 15hour of the office involved on such day, shall be deemed 16simultaneously filed as of 8:00 a.m. or the normal opening 17hour, as the case may be. Petitions filed by mail and received 18after midnight of the first day for filing and in the first 19mail delivery or pickup of that day shall be deemed 20simultaneously filed as of 8:00 a.m. of that day or as of the 21normal opening hour of such day, as the case may be. All 22petitions received thereafter shall be deemed filed in the 23order of actual receipt. However, 2 or more petitions filed 24within the last hour of the filing deadline shall be deemed 25filed simultaneously.   SB1693- 9 -LRB104 11438 LNS 21526 b1    Where 2 or more petitions are received simultaneously for 2the same office as of 8:00 a.m. on the first day for petition 3filing or as of the normal opening hour of the office of the 4board of election commissioners with whom such petitions are 5filed, the board of election commissioners shall break ties 6and determine the order of filing by means of a lottery or 7other fair and impartial method of random selection. Such 8lottery shall be conducted within 9 days following the last 9day for petition filing and shall be open to the public. Seven 10days written notice of the time and place of conducting such 11random selection shall be given by the board of election 12commissioners to all candidates who filed their petitions 13simultaneously and to each organization of citizens within the 14election jurisdiction that was entitled, under the general 15election law, at the next preceding election, to have poll 16watchers present on the day of election. The board of election 17commissioners shall post in a conspicuous, open, and public 18place, at the entrance of his or her office, notice of the time 19and place of such lottery. 20    All candidates shall be certified in the order in which 21their petitions have been filed and in the manner prescribed 22by Section 10-15 of the Election Code. Where candidates have 23filed simultaneously, they shall be certified in the order 24prescribed by this Section and prior to candidates who filed 25for the same office at a later time. 26    Where elections are conducted for unexpired terms, a   SB1693- 10 -LRB104 11438 LNS 21526 b1second lottery to determine ballot order shall be conducted 2for candidates who simultaneously file petitions for such 3unexpired terms. Such lottery shall be conducted in the same 4manner as prescribed by this Section for full term candidates. 5    Ballots for the election of board members shall be in the 6following form:  7(BALLOT FORMAT 8    Ballot position for candidates shall be determined by the 9order of petition filing or lottery held pursuant to this 10Section.11    The community college district is divided into 20 trustee 12districts, each of which elects one member to the board and 13votes on one member to serve at-large.) 14OFFICIAL BALLOT 15DISTRICT ....... (1 through 20) 16FOR MEMBERS OF THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE CITY COLLEGES OF 17CHICAGO TO SERVE 18A FULL 4-YEAR TERM 19VOTE FOR ONE 20( ) ..................................... 21( ) ..................................... 22( ) ..................................... 23OFFICIAL BALLOT 24AT LARGE 25FOR MEMBERS OF THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE CITY COLLEGES OF   SB1693- 11 -LRB104 11438 LNS 21526 b1CHICAGO TO SERVE 2A FULL 4-YEAR TERM 3VOTE FOR ONE 4( ) ..................................... 5( ) ..................................... 6( ) ..................................... 7REVERSE SIDE: 8OFFICIAL BALLOT 9DISTRICT ....... (1 through 20) 10(Precinct name or number) 11Community College District No. ......, ........... County, 12Illinois 13Election Tuesday (insert date) 14(facsimile signature of Election Authority) 15(County) 16    (110 ILCS 805/7-2.3 new)17    Sec. 7-2.3. Creation of trustee districts; reapportionment 18of districts.19    (a) For purposes of elections conducted pursuant to 20subsection (b) of Section 7-2 of this Act, the City of Chicago 21shall be subdivided into 20 trustee districts after the 22effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 23Assembly by the General Assembly for seats on the board. The 24trustee districts must be drawn on or before May 31, 2026. Each 25trustee district must be compact, contiguous, and   SB1693- 12 -LRB104 11438 LNS 21526 b1substantially equal in population. 2    (b) In the year following each decennial census, the 3General Assembly shall redistrict the trustee districts to 4reflect the results of the decennial census consistent with 5the requirements in subsection (a). The reapportionment plan 6shall be completed and formally approved by the General 7Assembly not less than 90 days before the last date 8established by law for the filing of nominating petitions for 9the second board election after the decennial census year. If 10by reapportionment a board member no longer resides within the 11trustee district from which the member was elected, the member 12shall continue to serve in office until the expiration of the 13member's regular term. All new members shall be elected from 14the trustee districts as reapportioned.  15    (110 ILCS 805/7-3)  (from Ch. 122, par. 107-3)16    Sec. 7-3. The organization of the board and election of 17officers for the a board appointed under Section 7-2 shall be 18conducted in accordance with the general election law and this 19Act.20(Source: P.A. 81-1489.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.